Particles.lexc
!File of all the uninflectable words

Multichar_Symbols

LEXICON Root
    ParticleClass ;

LEXICON ParticleClass
    Nominalparticles ;
    Verbalparticles ;

LEXICON Nominalparticles
kumu # ;
ki' # ;
na # ;

LEXICON Verbalparticles
pe' # ;
wa # ;
wan # ;
i # ;
pero # ;
o # ;
palh # ;
nalh # ;
